Utah statutes.
17-50-334.   Limitations on employee benefits imposed by a county.

(1)  For the purpose of this section:

(a)  "Accident and health insurance" is as defined in Section 31A-1-301.

(b)  "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer.

(c)  "Employee benefit" means one or more benefits or services provided to:

(i)  an employee; or

(ii)  a dependent of an employee.

(d)  "Private employer" means a person who has one or more employees employed in the same business, or in or about the same establishment, under any contract of hire, express or implied, oral or written.

(e)  "Insurance" is as defined in Section 31A-1-301.

(f)  "Life insurance" is as defined in Section 31A-1-301.

(2)  A county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that establishes, mandates, or requires a private employer to establish or offer an employee benefit, including:

(a)  accident and health insurance;

(b)  life insurance;

(c)  sick leave; or

(d)  family medical leave.

(3)  Nothing in this section prohibits a county from considering an employee benefit described in Subsection (2) among other criteria when issuing a request for proposals.

